New Jersey, session 221, A4744.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Minority means a person who is: (1) Black, which is a person having origins in any of the black racial groups in Africa; (2) Hispanic, which is a person of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean islands, regardless of race; (3) Asian American, which is a person having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian Subcontinent, Hawaii, or the Pacific Islands; or (4) American Indian or Alaskan native, which is a person having origins in any of the original peoples of North America. Minority business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a minority; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by minorities in which at least 51 percent of the ownership interest is held by minorities and the management and daily business operations of which are controlled by one or more of the minorities who own it; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more minorities who own it and which is at least 51 percent owned by one or more minorities, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minorities. Women's business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a woman; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by women in which at least 51 percent of the ownership is held by women; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more women who own it, and which is at least 51 percent owned by women, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women. b.  When offering employment, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, individuals who are minorities and women. c.  When awarding contracts for service, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, minority businesses and womens businesses. d.  The New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall publish on its Internet website information concerning: (1) the number of employees employed by the authority by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average salary range for each group; and (2) the number of contractors the authority has contracted with by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average contract awarded for each group. The New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall maintain and update this information on a quarterly basis. 2.    a.  As used in this section: Minority means a person who is: (1) Black, which is a person having origins in any of the black racial groups in Africa; (2) Hispanic, which is a person of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean islands, regardless of race; (3) Asian American, which is a person having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian Subcontinent, Hawaii, or the Pacific Islands; or (4) American Indian or Alaskan native, which is a person having origins in any of the original peoples of North America. Minority business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a minority; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by minorities in which at least 51 percent of the ownership interest is held by minorities and the management and daily business operations of which are controlled by one or more of the minorities who own it; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more minorities who own it and which is at least 51 percent owned by one or more minorities, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minorities. Women's business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a woman; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by women in which at least 51 percent of the ownership is held by women; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more women who own it, and which is at least 51 percent owned by women, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women. b.  When offering employment, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, individuals who are minorities and women. c.  When awarding contracts for service, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, minority businesses and womens businesses. d.  The South Jersey Transportation Authority shall publish on its Internet website information concerning: (1) the number of employees employed by the authority by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average salary range for each group; and (2) the number of contractors the authority has contracted with by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average contract awarded for each group. The South Jersey Transportation Authority shall maintain and update this information on a quarterly basis. 3.    a.  As used in this section: Minority means a person who is: (1) Black, which is a person having origins in any of the black racial groups in Africa; (2) Hispanic, which is a person of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean islands, regardless of race; (3) Asian American, which is a person having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian Subcontinent, Hawaii, or the Pacific Islands; or (4) American Indian or Alaskan native, which is a person having origins in any of the original peoples of North America. Minority business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a minority; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by minorities in which at least 51 percent of the ownership interest is held by minorities and the management and daily business operations of which are controlled by one or more of the minorities who own it; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more minorities who own it and which is at least 51 percent owned by one or more minorities, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minorities. Women's business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a woman; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by women in which at least 51 percent of the ownership is held by women; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more women who own it, and which is at least 51 percent owned by women, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women. b.  When offering employment, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, individuals who are minorities and women. c.  When awarding contracts for service, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, minority businesses and womens businesses. d.  The New Jersey Economic Development Authority shall publish on its Internet website information concerning: (1) the number of employees employed by the authority by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average salary range for each group; and (2) the number of contractors the authority has contracted with by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average contract awarded for each group. The New Jersey Economic Development Authority shall maintain and update this information on a quarterly basis. 4.    a.  As used in this section: Minority means a person who is: (1) Black, which is a person having origins in any of the black racial groups in Africa; (2) Hispanic, which is a person of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean islands, regardless of race; (3) Asian American, which is a person having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian Subcontinent, Hawaii, or the Pacific Islands; or (4) American Indian or Alaskan native, which is a person having origins in any of the original peoples of North America. Minority business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a minority; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by minorities in which at least 51 percent of the ownership interest is held by minorities and the management and daily business operations of which are controlled by one or more of the minorities who own it; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more minorities who own it and which is at least 51 percent owned by one or more minorities, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minorities. Women's business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a woman; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by women in which at least 51 percent of the ownership is held by women; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more women who own it, and which is at least 51 percent owned by women, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women. b.  When offering employment, the Casino Reinvestment Development Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, individuals who are minorities and women. c.  When awarding contracts for service, the Casino Reinvestment Development Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, minority businesses and womens businesses. d.  The Casino Reinvestment Development Authority shall publish on its Internet website information concerning: (1) the number of employees employed by the authority by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average salary range for each group; and (2) the number of contractors the authority has contracted with by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average contract awarded for each group. The Casino Reinvestment Development Authority shall maintain and update this information on a quarterly basis. 5.    a.  As used in this section: Minority means a person who is: (1) Black, which is a person having origins in any of the black racial groups in Africa; (2) Hispanic, which is a person of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean islands, regardless of race; (3) Asian American, which is a person having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian Subcontinent, Hawaii, or the Pacific Islands; or (4) American Indian or Alaskan native, which is a person having origins in any of the original peoples of North America. Minority business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a minority; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by minorities in which at least 51 percent of the ownership interest is held by minorities and the management and daily business operations of which are controlled by one or more of the minorities who own it; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more minorities who own it and which is at least 51 percent owned by one or more minorities, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minorities. Women's business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a woman; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by women in which at least 51 percent of the ownership is held by women; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more women who own it, and which is at least 51 percent owned by women, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women. b.  When offering employment, the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, individuals who are minorities and women. c.  When awarding contracts for service, the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, minority businesses and womens businesses. d.  The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey shall publish on its Internet website information concerning: (1) the number of employees employed by the port authority by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average salary range for each group; and (2) the number of contractors the port authority has contracted with by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average contract awarded for each group. The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey shall maintain and update this information on a quarterly basis. 6.    a.  As used in this section: Minority means a person who is: (1) Black, which is a person having origins in any of the black racial groups in Africa; (2) Hispanic, which is a person of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean islands, regardless of race; (3) Asian American, which is a person having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian Subcontinent, Hawaii, or the Pacific Islands; or (4) American Indian or Alaskan native, which is a person having origins in any of the original peoples of North America. Minority business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a minority; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by minorities in which at least 51 percent of the ownership interest is held by minorities and the management and daily business operations of which are controlled by one or more of the minorities who own it; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more minorities who own it and which is at least 51 percent owned by one or more minorities, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minorities. Women's business means a business which is: (1) a sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a woman; (2) a partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by women in which at least 51 percent of the ownership is held by women; or (3) a corporation or other entity of which the management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more women who own it, and which is at least 51 percent owned by women, or, if stock is issued, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women. b.  When offering employment, the Delaware River Port Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, individuals who are minorities and women. c.  When awarding contracts for service, the Delaware River Port Authority shall consider, and when feasible prioritize, minority businesses and womens businesses. d.  The Delaware River Port Authority shall publish on its Internet website information concerning: (1) the number of employees employed by the port authority by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average salary range for each group; and (2) the number of contractors the port authority has contracted with by gender, race, and ethnicity, and the average contract awarded for each group. The Delaware River Port Authority shall maintain and update this information on a quarterly basis. 7.  Sections 1 through 4 of P.L.      , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall take effect immediately but shall not be construed to impair any vested right or obligation under any contract or collective bargaining agreement prior to the date of enactment.  Section 5 of P.L.      , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall remain inoperative until the enactment into law of legislation substantially similar to P.L.      , c. (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) by the State of New York; however, if such legislation shall have been enacted prior to the enactment of P.L.      , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), section 5 of P.L.      , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall take effect immediately but shall not be construed to impair any vested right or obligation under any contract or collective bargaining agreement prior to the date of enactment.  Section 6 of P.L.      , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall remain inoperative until the enactment into law of legislation substantially similar to P.L.      , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania; however, if such legislation shall have been enacted prior to the enactment of P.L.      , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), section 6 of P.L.      , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall take effect immediately but shall not be construed to impair any vested right or obligation under any contract or collective bargaining agreement prior to the date of enactment.